Florida, session 2026, SB388.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (p) of subsection (4) of section 12 320.08056, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 320.08056âSpecialty license plates.â 14 (4)âThe following license plate annual use fees shall be 15 collected for the appropriate specialty license plates: 16 (p)âFlorida Wildflower license plate, $25, except that for 17 an owner purchasing the specialty plate for more than 10 18 vehicles registered to that owner, the annual use fee shall be 19 $15 per plate. 20 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.